Missouri, session 2026, SB1615.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 116.155 as enacted by senate bill no.
22, one hundred third general assembly, first regular session,
section 116.155 as enacted by house bill no. 676, ninetieth
general assembly, first regular session, section 116.160 as
enacted by senate bill no. 22, one hundred third general
assembly, first regular session, section 116.160 as enacted by
house bill no. 676, ninetieth general assembly, first regular
session, section 116.190 as enacted by senate bill no. 22, one
hundred third general assembly, first regular session, section
116.190 as enacted by senate bill no. 104, ninety-eighth general
assembly, first regular session, section 116.334 as enacted by
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1615 2
senate bill no. 22, one hundred third general assembly, first
regular session, and section 116.334 as enacted by house bill
no. 117, ninety-seventh general assembly, first regular
session, are repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 116.155, 116.160, 116.190, and
116.334, to read as follows:
[116.155. 1. The general assembly may
include the official summary statement and a
fiscal note summary in any statewide ballot
measure that it refers to the voters.
2. The official summary statement approved
by the general assembly shall, taken together
with the approved fiscal note summary, be the
official ballot title and such summary statement
shall contain no more than one hundred words,
excluding articles. The title shall be a true
and impartial statement of the purposes of the
proposed measure in language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create
prejudice either for or against the proposed
measure.
3. The fiscal note summary approved by the
general assembly shall contain no more than
fifty words, excluding articles, which shall
summarize the fiscal note prepared for the
measure in language neither argumentative nor
likely to create prejudice for or against the
proposed measure.]
116.155. 1. The general assembly may include the
official summary statement and a fiscal note summary in any
statewide ballot measure that it refers to the voters.
2. The official summary statement approved by the
general assembly shall, taken together with the approved
fiscal note summary, be the official ballot title and such
summary statement shall contain no more than [fifty] one
hundred words, excluding articles. The title shall be a
true and impartial statement of the purposes of the proposed

SB 1615 3
measure in language neither intentionally argumentative nor
likely to create prejudice either for or against the
proposed measure.
3. The fiscal note summary approved by the general
assembly shall contain no more than fifty words, excluding
articles, which shall summarize the fiscal note prepared for
the measure in language neither argumentative nor likely to
create prejudice for or against the proposed measure.
[116.160. 1. If the general assembly
adopts a joint resolution proposing a
constitutional amendment or a bill without a
fiscal note summary, which is to be referred to
a vote of the people, after receipt of such
resolution or bill the secretary of state shall
promptly forward the resolution or bill to the
state auditor. If the general assembly adopts a
joint resolution proposing a constitutional
amendment or a bill without an official summary
statement, which is to be referred to a vote of
the people, within twenty days after receipt of
the resolution or bill, the secretary of state
shall prepare and transmit to the attorney
general a summary statement of the measure as
the proposed summary statement. The secretary
of state may seek the advice of the legislator
who introduced the constitutional amendment or
bill and the speaker of the house or the
president pro tem of the legislative chamber
that originated the measure. The summary
statement may be distinct from the legislative
title of the proposed constitutional amendment
or bill. The attorney general shall within ten
days approve the legal content and form of the
proposed statement.
2. If the general assembly adopts a joint
resolution proposing a constitutional amendment
or statutory measure that includes an official
summary statement, the statement shall appear on
the ballot, unless it is challenged pursuant to
section 116.190, in which case the provisions of
that section shall apply.

SB 1615 4
3. The official summary statement shall
contain no more than one hundred words,
excluding articles. The title shall be a true
and impartial statement of the purposes of the
proposed measure in language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create
prejudice either for or against the proposed
measure.]
116.160. 1. If the general assembly adopts a joint
resolution proposing a constitutional amendment or a bill
without a fiscal note summary, which is to be referred to a
vote of the people, after receipt of such resolution or bill
the secretary of state shall promptly forward the resolution
or bill to the state auditor. If the general assembly
adopts a joint resolution proposing a constitutional
amendment or a bill without an official summary statement,
which is to be referred to a vote of the people, within
twenty days after receipt of the resolution or bill, the
secretary of state shall prepare and transmit to the
attorney general a summary statement of the measure as the
proposed summary statement. The secretary of state may seek
the advice of the legislator who introduced the
constitutional amendment or bill and the speaker of the
house or the president pro tem of the legislative chamber
that originated the measure. The summary statement may be
distinct from the legislative title of the proposed
constitutional amendment or bill. The attorney general
shall within ten days approve the legal content and form of
the proposed statement.
2. If the general assembly adopts a joint resolution
proposing a constitutional amendment or statutory measure
that includes an official summary statement, the statement
shall appear on the ballot, unless it is challenged pursuant

SB 1615 5
to section 116.190, in which case the provisions of that
section shall apply.
3. The official summary statement shall contain no
more than [fifty] one hundred words, excluding articles.
The title shall be a true and impartial statement of the
purposes of the proposed measure in language neither
intentionally argumentative nor likely to create prejudice
either for or against the proposed measure.
[116.190. 1. Any citizen who wishes to
challenge the official ballot title or the
fiscal note prepared for a proposed
constitutional amendment submitted by the
general assembly, by initiative petition, or by
constitutional convention, or for a statutory
initiative or referendum measure, may bring an
action in the circuit court of Cole County. The
action shall be brought within ten days after
the official ballot title is certified by the
secretary of state in accordance with the
provisions of this chapter, in the case of an
initiative petition and not later than the
twenty-second Tuesday prior to the general
election at which the ballot measure will be
submitted to the voters, in the case of all
other statewide ballot measures.
2. The secretary of state shall be named
as a party defendant in any action challenging
the official ballot title prepared by the
secretary of state. When the action challenges
the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary
prepared by the auditor, the state auditor shall
also be named as a party defendant. The
president pro tem of the senate, the speaker of
the house and the sponsor of the measure and the
secretary of state shall be the named party
defendants in any action challenging the
official summary statement, fiscal note or
fiscal note summary prepared pursuant to section
116.155.
3. The petition shall state the reason or
reasons why the summary statement portion of the

SB 1615 6
official ballot title is insufficient or
unfair. Alternatively, the petition shall state
the reasons why the fiscal note or the fiscal
note summary portion of the official ballot
title is insufficient or unfair and shall
request a different fiscal note or fiscal note
summary portion of the official ballot title.
4. (1) The action shall be placed at the
top of the civil docket.
(2) (a) Insofar as the action challenges
the summary statement portion of the official
ballot title, the court shall consider the
petition, hear arguments, and in its decision
certify the summary statement portion of the
official ballot title to the secretary of state
as originally written if the court finds the
summary statement to be sufficient and fair. If
the court finds the summary statement to be
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
suggested revisions for the summary statement to
remedy the legal flaws, but it shall, in its
decision, order the secretary of state to write
a first revised summary statement that is
sufficient and fair.
(b) The secretary of state shall submit a
first revised summary statement to the court
within seven days. If, after submission to the
court of a first revised summary statement by
the secretary of state, the court finds the
first revised summary statement to be sufficient
and fair, the court shall certify to the
secretary of state that statement and order it
to appear on the ballot. If the court finds the
first revised summary statement to be
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
suggested revisions for the statement to remedy
the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision,
order the secretary of state to write a second
revised summary statement that is sufficient and
fair.
(c) The secretary of state shall submit a
second revised summary statement to the court
within five days. If, after submission to the
court of a second revised summary statement by

SB 1615 7
the secretary of state, the court finds the
second revised summary statement to be
sufficient and fair, the court shall certify to
the secretary of state that statement and order
it to appear on the ballot. If the court finds
the second revised summary statement to be
insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
suggested revisions for the statement to remedy
the legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision,
order the secretary of state to write a third
revised summary statement that is sufficient and
fair.
(d) The secretary of state shall submit a
third revised summary statement to the court
within three days. If, after submission to the
court of a third revised summary statement by
the secretary of state, the court finds the
third revised summary statement to be sufficient
and fair, the court shall certify to the
secretary of state that statement and order it
to appear on the ballot. If the court finds the
third revised summary statement to be
100 insufficient or unfair, or if the secretary of
101 state neglects or refuses to submit any of the
102 revised summary statements within the times
103 mandated by this subdivision when so ordered,
104 the court shall revise the summary statement in
105 a manner that is sufficient and fair and order
106 the secretary of state to place that summary
107 statement on the ballot with the measure.
108 (e) During all revisions as provided in
109 this subdivision, the case shall remain open.
110 (f) Any nonprevailing party may make
111 appeals as provided by law only following:
112 a. The finding of the circuit court that a
113 summary statement was sufficient and fair; or
114 b. The circuit court ordering its own
115 summary statement to be placed on the ballot
116 pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subdivision.
117 (g) Any action brought pursuant to this
118 section challenging a statewide ballot measure
119 appearing on the ballot at an election called by
120 the governor pursuant to Article XII, Section
121 2(b), Missouri Constitution, whether at the

SB 1615 8
122 primary election or at a special election, or at
123 a special election for a referendum petition
124 measure called by the general assembly pursuant
125 to Article III, Section 52(b), Missouri
126 Constitution, shall be expedited by the court to
127 bring a resolution of the matter prior to the
128 printing of ballots. The court may shorten any
129 timeframe under this section to achieve this
130 purpose.
131 (3) Insofar as the action challenges the
132 fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion
133 of the official ballot title, the court shall
134 consider the petition, hear arguments, and in
135 its decision, either certify the fiscal note or
136 the fiscal note summary portion of the official
137 ballot title to the secretary of state or remand
138 the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary to
139 the auditor for preparation of a new fiscal note
140 or fiscal note summary pursuant to the
141 procedures set forth in section 116.175. Any
142 party to the suit may appeal to the supreme
143 court within ten days after a circuit court
144 decision pursuant to this subdivision.
145 5. Any action brought under this section
146 that is not fully and finally adjudicated within
147 one hundred eighty days of filing, and more than
148 seventy days prior to election in which the
149 measure is to appear, including all appeals,
150 shall be extinguished, unless a court extends
151 such period upon a finding of good cause for
152 such extension. Such good cause shall consist
153 only of court-related scheduling issues and
154 shall not include requests for continuance by
155 the parties.]
116.190. 1. Any citizen who wishes to challenge the
official ballot title or the fiscal note prepared for a
proposed constitutional amendment submitted by the general
assembly, by initiative petition, or by constitutional
convention, or for a statutory initiative or referendum
measure, may bring an action in the circuit court of Cole
County. The action [must] shall be brought within ten days

SB 1615 9
after the official ballot title is certified by the
secretary of state in accordance with the provisions of this
chapter, in the case of an initiative petition, and not
later than the twenty-second Tuesday prior to the general
election at which the ballot measure will be submitted to
the voters, in the case of all other statewide ballot
measures.
2. The secretary of state shall be named as a party
defendant in any action challenging the official ballot
title prepared by the secretary of state. When the action
challenges the fiscal note or the fiscal note summary
prepared by the auditor, the state auditor shall also be
named as a party defendant. The president pro tem of the
senate, the speaker of the house and the sponsor of the
measure and the secretary of state shall be the named party
defendants in any action challenging the official summary
statement, fiscal note or fiscal note summary prepared
pursuant to section 116.155.
3. The petition shall state the reason or reasons why
the summary statement portion of the official ballot title
is insufficient or unfair [and shall request a different
summary statement portion of the official ballot title].
Alternatively, the petition shall state the reasons why the
fiscal note or the fiscal note summary portion of the
official ballot title is insufficient or unfair and shall
request a different fiscal note or fiscal note summary
portion of the official ballot title.
4. (1) The action shall be placed at the top of the
civil docket.
(2) (a) Insofar as the action challenges the summary
statement portion of the official ballot title, the court
shall consider the petition, hear arguments, and in its

SB 1615 10
decision certify the summary statement portion of the
official ballot title to the secretary of state as
originally written if the court finds the summary statement
to be sufficient and fair. If the court finds the summary
statement to be insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
suggested revisions for the summary statement to remedy the
legal flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the
secretary of state to write a first revised summary
statement that is sufficient and fair.
(b) The secretary of state shall submit a first
revised summary statement to the court within seven days if
the action was originated in a year ending in an odd number,
but within three days if the action was originated in a year
ending in an even number. If, after submission to the court
of a first revised summary statement by the secretary of
state, the court finds the first revised summary statement
to be sufficient and fair, the court shall certify to the
secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on
the ballot. If the court finds the first revised summary
statement to be insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
suggested revisions for the statement to remedy the legal
flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of
state to write a second revised summary statement that is
sufficient and fair.
(c) The secretary of state shall submit a second
revised summary statement to the court within five days if
the action was originated in a year ending in an odd number,
but within two days if the action was originated in a year
ending in an even number. If, after submission to the court
of a second revised summary statement by the secretary of
state, the court finds the second revised summary statement
to be sufficient and fair, the court shall certify to the

SB 1615 11
secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on
the ballot. If the court finds the second revised summary
statement to be insufficient or unfair, the court may offer
suggested revisions for the statement to remedy the legal
flaws, but it shall, in its decision, order the secretary of
state to write a third revised summary statement that is
sufficient and fair.
(d) The secretary of state shall submit a third
revised summary statement to the court within three days if
the action was originated in a year ending in an odd number,
but within one day if the action was originated in a year
ending in an even number. If, after submission to the court
of a third revised summary statement by the secretary of
state, the court finds the third revised summary statement
to be sufficient and fair, the court shall certify to the
secretary of state that statement and order it to appear on
the ballot. If the court finds the third revised summary
statement to be insufficient or unfair, or if the secretary
of state neglects or refuses to submit any of the revised
summary statements within the times mandated by this
subdivision when so ordered, the court shall revise the
summary statement in a manner that is sufficient and fair
and order the secretary of state to place that summary
statement on the ballot with the measure.
(e) During all revisions as provided in this
subdivision, the case shall remain open.
(f) Any non-prevailing party may make appeals as
provided by law only following:
100 a. The finding of the circuit court that a summary
101 statement was insufficient or unfair; or

SB 1615 12
102 b. The circuit court ordering its own summary
103 statement to be placed on the ballot pursuant to paragraph
104 (d) of this subdivision.
105 (g) a. In any appeal of any decision of a circuit
106 court finding a summary statement to be sufficient and fair
107 pursuant to this subdivision, if the appellate court
108 concludes that the summary statement was in fact
109 insufficient or unfair, the appellate court shall remand the
110 summary statement to the circuit court for further
111 proceedings consistent with this subdivision. If the
112 appellate court finds the summary statement sufficient or
113 fair, the court may offer suggested revisions for the
114 summary statement to remedy the legal flaws, but the
115 appellate court shall not have authority to itself modify or
116 rewrite the summary statement. No other relief shall issue
117 from an appellate court on a challenge to a circuit court's
118 decision that a summary statement is insufficient and unfair
119 besides remanding the judgment to the circuit court for
120 further proceedings consistent with this section.
121 b. Notwithstanding subparagraph a of this paragraph to
122 the contrary, if an action brought under this section has
123 not been fully and finally adjudicated within one hundred
124 fifty-two days of filing, or if there are less than ninety-
125 eight days prior to the election at which the measure is to
126 appear, the provisions of subparagraph a of this paragraph
127 requiring the appellate court to remand the summary
128 statement to the circuit court shall not apply and an appeal
129 to the supreme court shall be permitted. If, upon such
130 appeal, the supreme court finds the summary statement
131 insufficient or unfair, the court may offer suggested
132 revisions for the summary statement to remedy the legal
133 flaws, but the supreme court shall not have authority to

SB 1615 13
134 itself modify or rewrite the summary statement. No other
135 relief shall issue from the supreme court on a challenge to
136 a circuit court's decision that a summary statement is
137 sufficient and fair besides remanding the judgment to the
138 circuit court for further proceedings consistent with this
139 section.
140 (h) Any action brought pursuant to this section
141 challenging a statewide ballot measure appearing on the
142 ballot at an election called by the governor pursuant to
143 Article XII, Section 2(b), Missouri Constitution, whether at
144 the primary election or at a special election, or at a
145 special election for a referendum petition measure called by
146 the general assembly pursuant to Article III, Section 52(b),
147 Missouri Constitution, shall be expedited by the court to
148 bring a resolution of the matter prior to the printing of
149 ballots. The court may shorten any timeframe under this
150 section to achieve this purpose.
151 (3) Insofar as the action challenges the fiscal note
152 or the fiscal note summary portion of the official ballot
153 title, the court shall consider the petition, hear
154 arguments, and in its decision, either certify the fiscal
155 note or the fiscal note summary portion of the official
156 ballot title to the secretary of state or remand the fiscal
157 note or the fiscal note summary to the auditor for
158 preparation of a new fiscal note or fiscal note summary
159 pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 116.175.
160 Any party to the suit may appeal to the supreme court within
161 ten days after a circuit court decision pursuant to this
162 subdivision. [In making the legal notice to election
163 authorities under section 116.240, and for the purposes of
164 section 116.180, the secretary of state shall certify the
165 language which the court certifies to him.]

SB 1615 14
166 5. Any action brought under this section that is not
167 fully and finally adjudicated within one hundred eighty days
168 of filing, and more than [fifty-six] seventy days prior to
169 election in which the measure is to appear, including all
170 appeals, shall be extinguished, unless a court extends such
171 period upon a finding of good cause for such extension.
172 Such good cause shall consist only of court-related
173 scheduling issues and shall not include requests for
174 continuance by the parties.
[116.334. 1. If the petition form is
approved, the secretary of state shall make a
copy of the sample petition available on the
secretary of state's website. For a period of
fifteen days after the petition is approved as
to form, the secretary of state shall accept
public comments regarding the proposed measure
and provide copies of such comments upon
request. Within twenty-three days of receipt of
such approval, the secretary of state shall
prepare and transmit to the attorney general a
summary statement of the measure which shall be
a concise statement not exceeding one hundred
words. This statement shall be in the form of a
question using language neither intentionally
argumentative nor likely to create prejudice
either for or against the proposed measure. The
attorney general shall within ten days approve
the legal content and form of the proposed
statement.
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date
the official ballot title is certified by the
secretary of state shall not be counted. Once
the secretary of state certifies the official
ballot title, signatures may be collected, even
if the ballot title is subject to an action in
court challenging the sufficiency and fairness
of the ballot title. If a court orders a change
that alters the content of the official ballot
title, then all signatures gathered before such
change occurred shall not be invalidated based

SB 1615 15
upon the fact that one or more signatures were
gathered prior to the alteration of the official
ballot title, regardless of whether those
signatures were gathered on petition pages that
displayed what was previously the official
ballot title as certified by the secretary of
state. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit
the invalidation of a signature for a reason
otherwise allowed by this chapter.
3. Signatures for statutory initiative
petitions shall be filed not later than six
months prior to the general election during
which the petition's ballot measure is submitted
for a vote, and shall also be collected not
earlier than the day after the day upon which
the previous general election was held.]
116.334. 1. If the petition form is approved, the
secretary of state shall make a copy of the sample petition
available on the secretary of state's website. For a period
of fifteen days after the petition is approved as to form,
the secretary of state shall accept public comments
regarding the proposed measure and provide copies of such
comments upon request. Within twenty-three days of receipt
of such approval, the secretary of state shall prepare and
transmit to the attorney general a summary statement of the
measure which shall be a concise statement not exceeding one
hundred words. This statement shall be in the form of a
question using language neither intentionally argumentative
nor likely to create prejudice either for or against the
proposed measure. The attorney general shall within ten
days approve the legal content and form of the proposed
statement.
2. Signatures obtained prior to the date the official
ballot title is certified by the secretary of state shall
not be counted. Once the secretary of state certifies the
official ballot title, signatures may be collected, even if

SB 1615 16
the ballot title is subject to an action in court
challenging the sufficiency and fairness of the ballot
title. If a court orders a change that alters the content
of the official ballot title, then all signatures gathered
before such change occurred shall not be invalidated based
upon the fact that one or more signatures were gathered
prior to the alteration of the official ballot title,
regardless of whether those signatures were gathered on
petition pages that displayed what was previously the
official ballot title as certified by the secretary of
state. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the
invalidation of a signature for a reason otherwise allowed
by this chapter.
3. Signatures for statutory initiative petitions shall
be filed not later than six months prior to the general
election during which the petition's ballot measure is
submitted for a vote, and shall also be collected not
earlier than the day after the day upon which the previous
general election was held.
✓